apertium-es-ca.es.dix
        <p>
          <l>jese</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cidas</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cida</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cidos</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cido</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cimos</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zco</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cís</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cen</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zcamos</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zca</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zcáis</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zcas</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zcan</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zca</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="frún/cir__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zan</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="condú/cir__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cánta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zcan</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zca</l>
          <r>cir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aducir">
      <p>
        <l>adú</l>
        <r>adu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="conducir">
      <p>
        <l>condú</l>
        <r>condu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="deducir">
      <p>
        <l>dedú</l>
        <r>dedu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="esparcir">
      <p>
	<l>espár</l>
	<r>espar</r>
      </p>
      <par n="frún/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="fruncir">
      <p>
        <l>frún</l>
        <r>frun</r>
      </p>
      <par n="frún/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="inducir">
      <p>
        <l>indú</l>
        <r>indu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="introducir">
      <p>
        <l>introdú</l>
        <r>introdu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="lucir">
      <p>
        <l>lú</l>
        <r>lu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="producir">
      <p>
        <l>prodú</l>
        <r>produ</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="reconducir">
      <p>
        <l>recondú</l>
        <r>recondu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="reducir">
      <p>
        <l>redú</l>
        <r>redu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="relucir">
      <p>
        <l>relú</l>
        <r>relu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="reproducir">
      <p>
        <l>reprodú</l>
        <r>reprodu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="resarcir">
      <p>
        <l>resár</l>
        <r>resar</r>
      </p>
      <par n="frún/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="seducir">
      <p>
        <l>sedú</l>
        <r>sedu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
    <e lm="traducir">
      <p>
        <l>tradú</l>
        <r>tradu</r>
      </p>
      <par n="condú/cir__vblex"/>
    </e>
<e lm="enlucir" a="prompsit"><p><l>enlú</l><r>enlu</r></p><par n="condú/cir__vblex"/></e>
